Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.022

Annual quality assurance report.

The department shall prepare an annual quality assurance report that must, at minimum, include: (1) Performance outcomes regarding health and safety of children in the children's services system; (2) children's length of stay in out-of-home placement from each date of referral; (3) adherence to permanency planning timelines; and (4) the response time on child protective services investigations differentiated by risk level determined at intake.

[ 2019 c 470 s 11.]